Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.140

Food stamps—Unlawful sale.

A person who sells food stamps obtained through the program established under RCW 74.04.500 or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, or food purchased therewith, is guilty of the following:

(1) A gross misdemeanor if the value of the stamps, benefits, or food transferred exceeds one hundred dollars; or

(2) A misdemeanor if the value of the stamps, benefits, or food transferred is one hundred dollars or less.

[ 2003 c 53 s 49; 1998 c 79 s 1; 1996 c 78 s 1; 1988 c 62 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.